Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-156
Lincoln.

The county of Lincoln is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township nine, north, of range thirty-four, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township nine, north, of range twenty-six, west; thence north to the fourth standard parallel; thence west to a point where the dividing line between ranges thirty-four and thirty-five intersects the same; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 34, p. 218;

R.S.1913, § 869;

C.S.1922, § 771;

C.S.1929, § 25-158;

R.S.1943, § 22-156.